Tables/Contraction/ko.ctb
always 혩 245-34-2-236
always 혪 245-34-2-256
always 혫 245-34-2-356
always 혬 245-34-26
always 혭 245-34-12
always 혮 245-34-12-3
always 혯 245-34-3
always 혰 245-34-3-3
always 혱 245-34-2356
always 혲 245-34-13
always 혳 245-34-23
always 혴 245-34-235
always 혵 245-34-236
always 혶 245-34-256
always 혷 245-34-356
always 호 245-136
always 혹 245-136-1
always 혺 245-136-1-1
always 혻 245-136-1-3
always 혼 245-136-25
always 혽 245-136-25-13
always 혾 245-136-25-356
always 혿 245-136-35
always 홀 245-136-2
always 홁 245-136-2-1
always 홂 245-136-2-26
always 홃 245-136-2-12
always 홄 245-136-2-3
always 홅 245-136-2-236
always 홆 245-136-2-256
always 홇 245-136-2-356
always 홈 245-136-26
always 홉 245-136-12
always 홊 245-136-12-3
always 홋 245-136-3
always 홌 245-136-3-3
always 홍 245-136-2356
always 홎 245-136-13
always 홏 245-136-23
always 홐 245-136-235
always 홑 245-136-236
always 홒 245-136-256
always 홓 245-136-356
always 화 245-1236
always 확 245-1236-1
always 홖 245-1236-1-1
always 홗 245-1236-1-3
always 환 245-1236-25
always 홙 245-1236-25-13
always 홚 245-1236-25-356
always 홛 245-1236-35
always 활 245-1236-2
always 홝 245-1236-2-1
always 홞 245-1236-2-26
always 홟 245-1236-2-12
always 홠 245-1236-2-3
always 홡 245-1236-2-236
always 홢 245-1236-2-256
always 홣 245-1236-2-356
always 홤 245-1236-26
always 홥 245-1236-12
always 홦 245-1236-12-3
always 홧 245-1236-3
always 홨 245-1236-3-3
always 황 245-1236-2356
always 홪 245-1236-13
always 홫 245-1236-23
always 홬 245-1236-235
always 홭 245-1236-236
always 홮 245-1236-256
always 홯 245-1236-356
always 홰 245-1236-1235
always 홱 245-1236-1235-1
always 홲 245-1236-1235-1-1
always 홳 245-1236-1235-1-3
always 홴 245-1236-1235-25
always 홵 245-1236-1235-25-13
always 홶 245-1236-1235-25-356
always 홷 245-1236-1235-35
always 홸 245-1236-1235-2
always 홹 245-1236-1235-2-1
always 홺 245-1236-1235-2-26
always 홻 245-1236-1235-2-12
always 홼 245-1236-1235-2-3
always 홽 245-1236-1235-2-236
always 홾 245-1236-1235-2-256
always 홿 245-1236-1235-2-356
always 횀 245-1236-1235-26
always 횁 245-1236-1235-12
always 횂 245-1236-1235-12-3
always 횃 245-1236-1235-3
always 횄 245-1236-1235-3-3
always 횅 245-1236-1235-2356
always 횆 245-1236-1235-13
always 횇 245-1236-1235-23
always 횈 245-1236-1235-235
always 횉 245-1236-1235-236
always 횊 245-1236-1235-256
always 횋 245-1236-1235-356
always 회 245-13456
always 획 245-13456-1
always 횎 245-13456-1-1
always 횏 245-13456-1-3
always 횐 245-13456-25
always 횑 245-13456-25-13
always 횒 245-13456-25-356
always 횓 245-13456-35
always 횔 245-13456-2
always 횕 245-13456-2-1
always 횖 245-13456-2-26
always 횗 245-13456-2-12
always 횘 245-13456-2-3
always 횙 245-13456-2-236
always 횚 245-13456-2-256
always 횛 245-13456-2-356
always 횜 245-13456-26
always 횝 245-13456-12
always 횞 245-13456-12-3
always 횟 245-13456-3
always 횠 245-13456-3-3
always 횡 245-13456-2356
always 횢 245-13456-13
always 횣 245-13456-23
always 횤 245-13456-235
always 횥 245-13456-236
always 횦 245-13456-256
always 횧 245-13456-356
always 효 245-346
always 횩 245-346-1
always 횪 245-346-1-1
always 횫 245-346-1-3
always 횬 245-346-25
always 횭 245-346-25-13
always 횮 245-346-25-356
always 횯 245-346-35
always 횰 245-346-2
always 횱 245-346-2-1
always 횲 245-346-2-26
always 횳 245-346-2-12
always 횴 245-346-2-3
always 횵 245-346-2-236
always 횶 245-346-2-256
always 횷 245-346-2-356
always 횸 245-346-26
always 횹 245-346-12
always 횺 245-346-12-3
always 횻 245-346-3
always 횼 245-346-3-3
always 횽 245-346-2356
always 횾 245-346-13
always 횿 245-346-23
always 훀 245-346-235
always 훁 245-346-236
always 훂 245-346-256
always 훃 245-346-356
always 후 245-134
always 훅 245-134-1
always 훆 245-134-1-1
always 훇 245-134-1-3
always 훈 245-134-25
always 훉 245-134-25-13
always 훊 245-134-25-356
always 훋 245-134-35
always 훌 245-134-2
always 훍 245-134-2-1
always 훎 245-134-2-26
always 훏 245-134-2-12
always 훐 245-134-2-3
always 훑 245-134-2-236
always 훒 245-134-2-256
always 훓 245-134-2-356
always 훔 245-134-26
always 훕 245-134-12
always 훖 245-134-12-3
always 훗 245-134-3
always 훘 245-134-3-3
always 훙 245-134-2356
always 훚 245-134-13
always 훛 245-134-23
always 훜 245-134-235
always 훝 245-134-236
always 훞 245-134-256
always 훟 245-134-356
always 훠 245-1234
always 훡 245-1234-1
always 훢 245-1234-1-1
always 훣 245-1234-1-3
always 훤 245-1234-25
always 훥 245-1234-25-13
always 훦 245-1234-25-356
always 훧 245-1234-35
always 훨 245-1234-2
always 훩 245-1234-2-1
always 훪 245-1234-2-26
always 훫 245-1234-2-12
always 훬 245-1234-2-3
always 훭 245-1234-2-236
always 훮 245-1234-2-256
always 훯 245-1234-2-356
always 훰 245-1234-26
always 훱 245-1234-12
always 훲 245-1234-12-3
always 훳 245-1234-3
always 훴 245-1234-3-3
always 훵 245-1234-2356
always 훶 245-1234-13
always 훷 245-1234-23
always 훸 245-1234-235
always 훹 245-1234-236
always 훺 245-1234-256
always 훻 245-1234-356
always 훼 245-1234-1235
always 훽 245-1234-1235-1
always 훾 245-1234-1235-1-1
always 훿 245-1234-1235-1-3
always 휀 245-1234-1235-25
always 휁 245-1234-1235-25-13
always 휂 245-1234-1235-25-356
always 휃 245-1234-1235-35
always 휄 245-1234-1235-2
always 휅 245-1234-1235-2-1
always 휆 245-1234-1235-2-26
always 휇 245-1234-1235-2-12
always 휈 245-1234-1235-2-3
always 휉 245-1234-1235-2-236
always 휊 245-1234-1235-2-256
always 휋 245-1234-1235-2-356
always 휌 245-1234-1235-26
always 휍 245-1234-1235-12
always 휎 245-1234-1235-12-3
always 휏 245-1234-1235-3
always 휐 245-1234-1235-3-3
always 휑 245-1234-1235-2356
always 휒 245-1234-1235-13
always 휓 245-1234-1235-23
always 휔 245-1234-1235-235
always 휕 245-1234-1235-236
always 휖 245-1234-1235-256
always 휗 245-1234-1235-356
always 휘 245-134-1235
always 휙 245-134-1235-1
always 휚 245-134-1235-1-1
always 휛 245-134-1235-1-3
always 휜 245-134-1235-25
always 휝 245-134-1235-25-13
always 휞 245-134-1235-25-356
always 휟 245-134-1235-35
always 휠 245-134-1235-2
always 휡 245-134-1235-2-1
always 휢 245-134-1235-2-26
always 휣 245-134-1235-2-12
always 휤 245-134-1235-2-3
always 휥 245-134-1235-2-236
always 휦 245-134-1235-2-256
always 휧 245-134-1235-2-356
always 휨 245-134-1235-26
always 휩 245-134-1235-12
always 휪 245-134-1235-12-3
always 휫 245-134-1235-3
always 휬 245-134-1235-3-3
always 휭 245-134-1235-2356
always 휮 245-134-1235-13
always 휯 245-134-1235-23
always 휰 245-134-1235-235
always 휱 245-134-1235-236
always 휲 245-134-1235-256
always 휳 245-134-1235-356
always 휴 245-146
always 휵 245-146-1
always 휶 245-146-1-1
always 휷 245-146-1-3
always 휸 245-146-25
always 휹 245-146-25-13
always 휺 245-146-25-356
always 휻 245-146-35
always 휼 245-146-2
always 휽 245-146-2-1
always 휾 245-146-2-26
always 휿 245-146-2-12
always 흀 245-146-2-3
always 흁 245-146-2-236
always 흂 245-146-2-256
always 흃 245-146-2-356
always 흄 245-146-26
always 흅 245-146-12
always 흆 245-146-12-3
always 흇 245-146-3
always 흈 245-146-3-3
always 흉 245-146-2356
always 흊 245-146-13
always 흋 245-146-23
always 흌 245-146-235
always 흍 245-146-236
always 흎 245-146-256
always 흏 245-146-356
always 흐 245-246
always 흑 245-246-1
always 흒 245-246-1-1
always 흓 245-246-1-3
always 흔 245-246-25
always 흕 245-246-25-13
always 흖 245-246-25-356
always 흗 245-246-35
always 흘 245-246-2
always 흙 245-246-2-1
always 흚 245-246-2-26
always 흛 245-246-2-12
always 흜 245-246-2-3
always 흝 245-246-2-236
always 흞 245-246-2-256
always 흟 245-246-2-356
always 흠 245-246-26
always 흡 245-246-12
always 흢 245-246-12-3
always 흣 245-246-3
always 흤 245-246-3-3
always 흥 245-246-2356
always 흦 245-246-13
always 흧 245-246-23
always 흨 245-246-235
always 흩 245-246-236
always 흪 245-246-256
always 흫 245-246-356
always 희 245-2456
always 흭 245-2456-1
always 흮 245-2456-1-1
always 흯 245-2456-1-3
always 흰 245-2456-25
always 흱 245-2456-25-13
always 흲 245-2456-25-356
always 흳 245-2456-35
always 흴 245-2456-2
always 흵 245-2456-2-1
always 흶 245-2456-2-26
always 흷 245-2456-2-12
always 흸 245-2456-2-3
always 흹 245-2456-2-236
always 흺 245-2456-2-256
always 흻 245-2456-2-356
always 흼 245-2456-26
always 흽 245-2456-12
always 흾 245-2456-12-3
always 흿 245-2456-3
always 힀 245-2456-3-3
always 힁 245-2456-2356
always 힂 245-2456-13
always 힃 245-2456-23
always 힄 245-2456-235
always 힅 245-2456-236
always 힆 245-2456-256
always 힇 245-2456-356
always 히 245-135
always 힉 245-135-1
always 힊 245-135-1-1
always 힋 245-135-1-3
always 힌 245-135-25
always 힍 245-135-25-13
always 힎 245-135-25-356
always 힏 245-135-35
always 힐 245-135-2
always 힑 245-135-2-1
always 힒 245-135-2-26
always 힓 245-135-2-12
always 힔 245-135-2-3
always 힕 245-135-2-236
always 힖 245-135-2-256
always 힗 245-135-2-356
always 힘 245-135-26
always 힙 245-135-12
always 힚 245-135-12-3
always 힛 245-135-3
always 힜 245-135-3-3
always 힝 245-135-2356
always 힞 245-135-13
always 힟 245-135-23
always 힠 245-135-235
always 힡 245-135-236
always 힢 245-135-256
always 힣 245-135-356
always ﾠ 0
always ﾡ 1
always ﾢ 1-1
always ﾣ 1-3
always ﾤ 25
always ﾥ 25-13
always ﾦ 25-356
always ﾧ 35
always ﾨ 35-35
always ﾩ 2
always ﾪ 2-1
always ﾫ 2-26
always ﾬ 2-12
always ﾭ 2-3
always ﾮ 2-236
always ﾯ 2-256
always ﾰ 2-356
always ﾱ 26
always ﾲ 12
always ﾳ 12-12
always ﾴ 12-3
always ﾵ 3
always ﾶ 3-3
always ﾷ 2356
always ﾸ 13
always ﾹ 13-13
always ﾺ 23
always ﾻ 235
always ﾼ 236
always ﾽ 256
always ﾾ 356
always ￂ 126
always ￃ 1235
always ￄ 345
always ￅ 345-1235
always ￆ 234
always ￇ 1345
always ￊ 156
always ￋ 34
always ￌ 136
always ￍ 1236
always ￎ 1236-1235
always ￏ 13456
always ￒ 346
always ￓ 134
always ￔ 1234
always ￕ 1234-1235
always ￖ 134-1235
always ￗ 146
always ￚ 246
always ￛ 2456
always ￜ 135
